Arkansas, session 2025, HB1769.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 12, Chapter 9, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
12-9-127. Psychological evaluations or assessments.
(a) The Arkansas Commission on Law Enforcement Standards and Training
shall require all individuals to be evaluated or assessed by a licensed
psychiatrist or psychologist before employment with a law enforcement agency.
(b) A law enforcement officer employed by a law enforcement agency,
regardless of whether employed full time, part time, or on an auxiliary
basis, shall be evaluated or assessed every five (5) years by an individual
licensed to practice psychiatry or psychology and qualified to perform a
psychological evaluation or assessment in this state.
(c) A psychological evaluation or assessment under this section may be
conducted in-person or through telemedicine.
*JMB476*
03-20-2025 10:06:28 JMB476

As Engrossed: H3/20/25 HB1769
(d) A law enforcement officer seeking employment with a new or
different law enforcement agency shall not submit a psychological evaluation
or assessment that is older than two (2) years to a law enforcement agency or
the commission.
(e) A law enforcement officer shall update his or her psychological
evaluation or assessment every five (5) years with the commission to maintain
law enforcement officer certification.

/s/Barnett



























03-20-2025 10:06:28 JMB476